Maine, session 132, LD336.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §6448, sub-§6, as repealed and replaced by PL 2015, c. 428, §6,
is amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
The commissioner shall create a waiting list for a zone at the time the commissioner closes
the zone pursuant to subsection 2, paragraph D. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, the exit ratio for any waiting list established by the commissioner pursuant to
this subsection is one to one.